Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201579-10,143
Parent or guardian; provide information regarding qualification; school district; duties.

A parent or guardian of any student enrolled in, or in the process of enrolling in, any school district in the state may voluntarily provide information on any application submitted pursuant to Nebraska law, rules, and regulations regarding the applicant's potential to meet the qualifications for free or reduced-price lunches without regard to whether the school the child attends, or will attend, is a school that uses such information to qualify students for free or reduced-price meals or a school that provides free meals to all students pursuant to the community eligibility provision. Each school district shall process information provided pursuant to this section for students who attend a school that provides free meals to all students pursuant to the community eligibility provision in the same manner to determine the qualification status of the student as the information for students who attend school in a school building that uses such information to qualify students for free or reduced-price meals. Each school district shall comply with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as such act and section existed on January 1, 2015, and regulations adopted thereunder with regard to any information collected pursuant to this section. If no such information is provided, the student shall be presumed not to qualify for free or reduced-price lunches for the purposes of the application.

Laws 2015, LB525, § 3.
August 30, 2015